North Carolina, session 2025, HB760.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 130A-283 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-283. Tattooing regulated.
(a) Definition. – As used in this Part, the term "tattooing" means the inserting of
permanent markings or coloration, or the producing of scars, upon or under human skin through
puncturing by use of a needle or any other method.
(b) Prohibited Practice. Tattooing Permit Required; Exemptions. – No person shall
engage in tattooing without first obtaining a tattooing permit from the Department. Licensed
physicians, as well as physician assistants and nurse practitioners working under the supervision
of a licensed physician, who perform tattooing within the normal course of their professional
practice are exempt from the requirements of this Part.
(c) Application. Permit Application. – To Any person seeking to obtain a tattooing
permit, a person must permit shall apply to the Department. Department on forms prescribed by
the Department. Upon receipt of the application, the Department, acting through the local health
department, shall (i) verify that the applicant has completed the bloodborne pathogen training
required by subsection (c1) of this section and (ii) inspect the premises, instruments, utensils,
equipment, and procedures of the applicant to determine whether the applicant meets the
requirements for a tattooing permit set by the Commission. If the applicant meets these
requirements, the Department shall issue a permit to the applicant. A permit is valid for one year
and must be renewed annually by applying to the Department for a permit renewal.
(c1) Annual Bloodborne Pathogen Training. – Each applicant seeking an initial or renewal
tattooing permit under this section is required to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Department
that the applicant has completed annual training in compliance with the Occupational Safety and
Health Association's bloodborne pathogens standard set forth in 29 C.F.R. § 1910.1030.
(d) Violations. – The Department may deny an application for a an initial or renewal
tattooing permit if an applicant fails to demonstrate successful completion of the bloodborne
pathogen training required by subsection (c1) of this section or does not meet the requirements
set by the Commission for the permit. The Department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew
a permit if it finds that tattooing is being performed in violation of this Part. In accordance with
G.S. 130A-24(a), Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Administrative Procedure Act,
governs appeals concerning the enforcement of this Part.
*H760-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Limitation. – A permit issued pursuant to this Part does not authorize a person to
remove a tattoo from the body of a human being. Compliance with this Part is not a bar to
prosecution for a violation of G.S. 14-400."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to tattooing
permit applications received by the Department of Health and Human Services on or after that
date.
Page 2 House Bill 760-First Edition